Hawaii statutes.
§121-14 Officers and warrant officers;
qualifications, appointment, tenure. Commissioned officers and warrant
officers shall be citizens of the United States and shall be at least
twenty-one years of age or such lower age as may be authorized for appointment
as reserve officers of the army or the air force by federal laws and
regulations. They shall be appointed upon the order of the governor, subject
to federal recognition as commissioned officers and warrant officers in the
army or air national guard, except as to those officers appointed as
aides-de-camp to the governor and staff positions not requiring federal
recognition. Officers and warrant officers whose appointments are subject to
federal recognition shall meet the qualifications prescribed by the secretary
of the army or the air force, as the case may be. The commissions of all
officers and appointments of warrant officers shall continue in force
indefinitely and until they are separated from the service of the national
guard in accordance with this chapter. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next